Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Part 3 Application, Examination and Issuance

31-10.3-13.
Requirements — Commercial.

License required — requirements. Every person applying for an original or renewal of a commercial license shall be required to comply with and be issued a commercial license meeting the requirements of the Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986 (see now 49 U.S.C. § 31101 et seq.) and the implementing regulations in 49 CFR 383 and 384, as may be amended from time to time.

No person, except those expressly exempted in this chapter, shall drive any commercial motor vehicle upon a highway in this state unless that person has a valid commercial license under the provisions of this chapter for the type or class of vehicle being driven.

No person, except those expressly exempted in this chapter, shall steer or, while within the passenger compartment of a vehicle, exercise any degree of physical control of a vehicle being towed by a motor vehicle upon a highway in this state unless that person has a valid commercial license under the provisions of this chapter for the type or class of vehicle being towed.

No person shall receive a commercial license unless and until he or she surrenders to the department all valid licenses in his or her possession issued to him or her by this or any other jurisdiction. All surrendered licenses issued by another jurisdiction shall be returned to it, together with information that the person is licensed in this state. No person holding a commercial license shall be permitted to have more than one license at any time.

Any person licensed as a commercial driver pursuant to this chapter may exercise that privilege granted upon all streets and highways in this state, and shall not be required to obtain any other license to exercise that privilege by any municipal, local board, or other body having authority to adopt local police regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 77, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 82, § 2.

31-10.3-14.
Classes of licenses — Endorsements.

The department, upon issuing a commercial license, shall indicate on the license the class or type of vehicles the licensee may drive. Licenses shall be issued with the classifications and endorsements and any restrictions as defined by state regulation or 49 C.F.R. 383.

The department shall establish any qualifications that it believes reasonably necessary for the safe operation of the various types, sizes, or combinations of vehicles and shall determine by appropriate examination whether each applicant is qualified for the license classification, endorsement, or restriction for which application has been made.

The department shall not issue a commercial license unless the applicant meets the following qualifications in addition to all other applicable qualifications adopted by policy or regulation:

The applicant shall be at least twenty-one (21) years of age; except for intrastate operations, the applicant must be at least eighteen (18) years of age. This exception shall not apply to school bus drivers and drivers of placarded vehicles.

The applicant shall not currently be under a license or privilege withdrawal in this or any other state, Mexico, or province of Canada.

Within the three (3) years immediately preceding the application, the applicant shall not have committed any of the offenses for which license withdrawal is mandatory upon conviction and shall not have engaged in any conduct for which a license withdrawal may be implemented.

The applicant shall not have been found to have committed a disqualifying offense under the Federal Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986 (now 49 U.S.C. § 31101 et seq.), as may be amended from time to time.

The applicant shall certify in the license application that all of these qualifications have been met.

The department shall not issue a tank endorsement unless the applicant, in addition to all other applicable qualifications, has been licensed for a vehicle or combination of vehicles covered by the license classification on which the tank endorsement shall be placed.

The department shall not issue a school bus endorsement unless the applicant has had at least three (3) years of driving experience prior to the date of application and the department is fully satisfied as to the applicant’s good character, competency, and fitness to be so employed. Effective September 30, 2005, all school bus operators must have the “S” endorsement as defined under 49 Code of Federal Regulations § 383.153(a)(9)(vi) subject to endorsement and testing requirements set forth in 49 Code of Federal Regulations §§ 383.93 and 383.123. The administrator shall adopt regulations governing character, competency, and fitness.

The department shall not issue a passenger endorsement unless the applicant has had at least three (3) years of driving experience prior to the date of application and the department is fully satisfied as to the applicant’s good character, competency, and fitness to be so employed. The administrator shall adopt regulations governing character, competency, and fitness.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 401, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 77, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 82, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 84, § 1.

31-10.3-15.
Persons not eligible for licensing.

The department shall not issue any license pursuant to this chapter:

To any person, as a commercial driver, who is under the age of twenty-one (21) years; except for intrastate operations, the applicant must be at least eighteen (18) years of age. This exception shall not apply to school bus drivers and drivers of placarded vehicles.

To any person whose license or privilege has been suspended, canceled, revoked or otherwise withdrawn during suspension, cancellation, revocation, or withdrawal and not until the person has complied with all requirements for reinstatement.

To any person who is a habitual drunkard, or is addicted to controlled substances.

To any person who is required by this chapter to take an examination, unless the person shall have successfully passed the examination.

To any person when the administrator has good cause based on clear and convincing evidence to believe that the person does not meet a standard of physical or mental fitness for motor vehicle licensure established pursuant to §

31-10-44(b)

, and that the person’s physical or mental condition prevents him or her from being able to operate a motor vehicle with safety upon the highways. However, an insulin dependent person shall not automatically be denied a license. Each case shall be decided individually; certification by a physician that the person is being regularly monitored, that the person’s condition is stable and under control, and that the person is otherwise medically qualified to safely operate a motor vehicle shall be conclusive and a license strictly limited to intrastate use shall be issued. The license must clearly state on its face that the license is restricted to intrastate use only; provided, however, nothing contained in this section shall prohibit the issuance of an interstate license as long as all federal regulations are met.

To any person who is required under the laws of this state to file or deposit proof of financial responsibility and who has not deposited that proof.

To any person when, after a hearing, the administrator has good cause to conclude that the operation of a motor vehicle on the highways by the person is likely to pose an imminent safety risk to the general public by reason of the person’s past conduct in motor vehicle operation during the preceding two (2) year period. The hearing shall focus exclusively upon whether a declination to issue a license is necessary in order to protect public safety, relying upon findings of the circumstances under which each past motor vehicle offense was committed, the likelihood of recurrence, and the deterrent effect that might reasonably be expected from the declination.

The department shall notify in writing any person whose application for a license has been denied pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. The notice shall contain the factual and legal basis for the denial, the procedure for requesting a hearing, and the rights afforded the individual pursuant to §

31-11-7(d)

— (f). When physical or mental fitness is the basis for the denial, the notice shall refer to the specific functional standard promulgated pursuant to §

31-10-44(b)

, which was relied upon by the department. Upon his or her request the department shall afford the license applicant an opportunity for a hearing as early as practical and no later than twenty (20) days after receipt of the request.

The hearing procedures afforded the applicant shall conform to the provisions of §

31-11-7(d)

— (f).

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 401, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 349, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 89, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 297, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 298, § 1.

31-10.3-16.
Persons exempt from licensing.

The following persons shall be exempt from the commercial licensing requirements under this chapter:

Any active duty military personnel, members of the military reserves, members of the National Guard on active duty, including personnel on full-time National Guard duty, personnel on part-time National Guard training, and National Guard military technicians (civilians who are required to wear military uniforms), and active duty U.S. Coast Guard personnel while operating a motor vehicle for military purposes.

Any person eighteen (18) years or older who satisfies the exemptions set forth in 49 CFR 391.67, as may from time to time be amended, while driving or operating any farm tractor, implement of husbandry temporarily operated or moved on a highway, or any farm vehicle, which would otherwise require the driver to be the holder of a commercial driver’s license, provided that said farm vehicle is under seventy-six thousand six hundred (76,600) lbs. registered weight and is not a truck- tractor, semi-trailer combination as defined by §

31-1-5(d)

, and further provided that the farm vehicle is used to transport either agricultural products, farm machinery, farm supplies, or both to or from a farm.

A nonresident who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age and who has in his or her immediate possession a valid license equivalent to a Rhode Island class license issued to him or her in his or her home state, or province of Canada, may operate a motor vehicle in this state of a comparable class.

Firefighters and other persons who operate commercial motor vehicles which are necessary to the preservation of life or property or the execution of emergency governmental functions are equipped with audible and visual signals and are not subject to normal traffic regulation. These vehicles include fire trucks, hook and ladder trucks, foam or water transport trucks, police SWAT team vehicles, ambulances, or other vehicles that are used in response to emergencies.

Any person operating a vehicle for personal or family use such as a motorized camper or travel trailer equipped with permanent living and sleeping facilities used for camping activities. Any furtherance of commercial or quasi-commercial enterprise shall lapse this exemption.

A nonresident, who establishes residency in the state of Rhode Island, may operate a commercial vehicle in this state not to exceed thirty (30) days from the date of establishing that residency; provided, that the nonresident has in his or her immediate possession a valid commercial license issued by another state, or province of Canada.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 404, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 77, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 82, § 2.

31-10.3-17.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 63, effective July 7, 2000.

31-10.3-18.
Applications.

Every application for a commercial license, change of endorsement, classification, or restriction shall be made upon a form furnished by the department. Every application shall be accompanied by a valid license and by the nonrefundable fee of ten dollars ($10.00). This application fee shall be used by the department to offset the costs of investigating the applicants.

Every application shall state the full name, date of birth, sex, current mailing address, residential address, height, weight, hair and eye color, social security number, and whether the applicant’s license or privilege is withdrawn or whether an application has ever been refused, and if so, the date of and reason for the withdrawal or refusal. It shall also require the applicant to disclose any other names used in the past and any other information that the department may require to determine the applicant’s identity, competency, and eligibility. It shall be signed by the applicant under the penalties of perjury.

Whenever an application is received from a person previously licensed in another jurisdiction, the department shall request and accept a copy of the driver’s record in that jurisdiction with the same force and effect as though entered on the driver’s record in this state in the original instance.

The provisions of §

11-18-1

shall apply to any person who falsely signs or attests the affidavit, under oath, required by this section. Any false attestation, knowingly made, shall also be punishable by suspension of the commercial license or privilege of that person for a period of not less than one year nor more than two (2) years; provided, that person shall be entitled to the rights and remedies established by §

31-11-15

.

The medical examiner’s certificate or medical certification required prior to the issuance of a commercial driver’s license may be electronically transmitted to the division of motor vehicles by electronic means of transmission approved by the department of motor vehicles that shall be accessible through the department’s website by way of a menu item labeled “commercial driver’s license (CDL) medical certificate,” so long as the transmission is legible.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 17, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 19, § 1.

31-10.3-19.
Examination of applicants.

The department shall examine every applicant for a commercial license or learner’s permit. The examination shall include: (1) A test of the applicant’s eyesight to be administered according to standards set by the Federal Motor Carrier Regulations; (2) His or her ability to read English in understanding highway signs regulating, warning, and directing traffic; (3) His or her knowledge of the traffic laws of this state; and (4) Shall include an actual demonstration of ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motor vehicle or combination of vehicles of the type covered by the license classification, endorsement, or restrictions which the applicant is seeking. Each applicant shall successfully complete the skills test in the following order:

Pre-trip inspection;

Basic vehicle controls skills; and

On-road skills.

If an applicant fails one segment of the skills test, the applicant cannot continue to the next segment of the test; however, scores for the passed segments of the skills test shall remain valid and an applicant will not be required to retake the segments previously passed prior to expiration of the commercial learner’s permit. The examination may also include any further physical and mental examinations that the department deems necessary to determine the applicant’s fitness to safely operate a motor vehicle upon the highways.

A nonresident, who establishes residence in the state of Rhode Island and makes application for a Rhode Island commercial license, shall not be required to demonstrate his or her ability to operate a motor vehicle, unless the examiner has reason to believe such a demonstration is needed; provided, that the nonresident surrenders a valid commercial license that was issued under the requirements of the Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986 (see now 49 U.S.C. § 31101 et seq.); may be as amended from time to time by another state.

The department shall be permitted to promulgate rules and regulations pertaining to third-party testing for the skills tests required for commercial driver’s licenses in accordance with 49 C.F.R. Part 383, as it may be revised from time to time.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 77, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 82, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 49, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 75, § 1.

31-10.3-20.
Fees.

The fees charged for commercial licenses, endorsements, classifications, restrictions, and required examinations shall be as follows:

For every commercial operator’s first license, thirty dollars ($30.00);

For every renewal of a commercial license, fifty dollars ($50.00);

For every duplicate commercial license, ten dollars ($10.00);

For every duplicate commercial learner’s permit, ten dollars ($10.00);

For any change of:

Classification(s), ten dollars ($10.00);

Endorsement(s), ten dollars ($10.00);

Restriction(s), ten dollars ($10.00);

For every written and/or oral examination, ten dollars ($10.00);

For the division of motor vehicles to administer the skill test, one hundred dollars ($100);

For every commercial learner’s permit, sixty dollars ($60.00).

[Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 49, § 1 and P.L. 2019, ch. 75, § 1].

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 219, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 19, § 13; P.L. 2015, ch. 58, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 63, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 49, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 3, § 5, effective January 1, 2022.

31-10.3-21.
Revenue.

Revenue derived from the fees assessed in this chapter shall be deposited in general revenue.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 85, § 3.

31-10.3-22.
Document security.

The department shall use any process or processes in the issuance of licenses that will prohibit, as nearly as practicable, the ability to alter or reproduce the license or the ability to superimpose a photograph on the license without ready detection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1.

31-10.3-23.
Expiration of licenses.

Every commercial license issued by the department shall expire on the licensee’s birth date in the fifth year following the initial issuance, excluding commercial learner’s permits which shall expire one year from the date of initial issuance, and excluding a first issuance which shall expire on the licensee’s birth date in the second year following initial issuance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 58, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 63, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 49, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 75, § 1.

31-10.3-24.
Renewals.

Every commercial license shall be renewable as early as forty-five (45) days before its expiration upon application, payment of all required fees, and satisfactory completion of any examination required by federal or state law or regulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 174, § 1.

31-10.3-25.
Existing commercial drivers.

The department shall be permitted to promulgate rules and regulations pertaining to requirements authorizing the division of motor vehicles to issue newly established commercial license classification(s), endorsement(s), or restriction(s) to current licensees. The rules and regulations shall comply with the federal regulations or standards relative to existing commercial drivers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1.

31-10.3-26.
License to be carried and exhibited on demand.

Every licensee shall have his or her commercial license or permit in his or her immediate possession at all times when operating a motor vehicle and shall display the license or permit upon demand of any peace officer or officer of the division of motor vehicles, and shall, upon request by any proper officer, write his or her name in the presence of that officer for the purpose of being identified.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1.

31-10.3-27.
Limitation on number of driver’s licenses.

No person holding a commercial license, who operates a motor vehicle, shall have more than one license from any jurisdiction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1.

31-10.3-28.
Notification required by employee.

Notification of violations.

To state. Any person holding a commercial license issued by this state, who is convicted of violating, in any type of motor vehicle, any federal law, state law, or local ordinance relating to motor vehicles in this state, any other state or province of Canada, other than parking violations, shall notify the department of the conviction in the manner specified by the department within thirty (30) days of the date of conviction.

To employers. Any person holding a commercial license issued by this state, who is convicted of violating any, in any type of motor vehicles, federal law, state law, or local ordinance relating to motor vehicles in this state, any other state or province of Canada, other than parking violations, shall notify his or her employer, in writing, of the conviction within thirty (30) days of the date of conviction.

Notification of suspensions, revocations, and cancellations. Each person whose license is suspended, revoked, cancelled or otherwise withdrawn by this state or who loses the privilege to operate a motor vehicle in any state or province of Canada for any period, shall notify his or her employer of that fact before the end of the business day following the day the employee received notice of that fact. The employee shall also notify the division of motor vehicles in all cases of out-of-state and province of Canada suspensions, revocations, cancellations, or any withdrawal within seven (7) days of any those actions.

Notification of previous employment.

Any person who has applied to be a commercial motor vehicle driver shall provide the employer, at the time of the application, with the following information for the ten (10) years preceding the date of application:

A list of the names and addresses of the applicant’s previous employers for which the applicant was a driver of a commercial motor vehicle.

The dates between which the applicant drove for each employer.

The reason for leaving that employer.

The applicant shall certify that all information furnished is true and complete. An employer may require an applicant to provide additional information as deemed necessary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1.

31-10.3-29.
Employer responsibilities.

No employer shall knowingly allow, permit, or authorize an employee to operate a commercial motor vehicle in the United States or province of Canada during any period:

In which the employee has more than one license;

Prior to obtaining, on a written application, the information specified in §

31-10.3-28(c)

;

When the employee’s license is suspended, revoked, cancelled, or otherwise withdrawn;

During any period in which the driver, or the commercial motor vehicle he or she is driving, or the motor carrier operator, is subject to an out-of-service order; or

In violation of a federal, state, or local law or regulation pertaining to railroad-highway grade crossings.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 171, § 1.

31-10.3-30.
Commercial driver’s license required.

Except when operating under a commercial learner’s permit and accompanied by the holder of a commercial license valid for the vehicle being operated, no person shall operate a commercial motor vehicle unless the person has been issued a valid commercial driver’s license containing the endorsements, classifications, or restrictions applicable to the type of vehicle being operated.

No person shall be issued a commercial driver’s license until he or she has passed a written and driving test for the operation of a commercial motor vehicle that complies with the minimum federal standards in 49 C.F.R. Part 383, as revised from time to time, and has satisfied all other federal requirements as well as any other requirements imposed by state law subject to the provisions of §

31-10.3-19(a)

. The tests shall be prescribed and conducted by the department or a third party designated by the department.

A commercial license may be issued only to a person who operates, or who intends to operate, commercial motor vehicles and who is domiciled in this state.

A commercial license shall not be issued to a person during a period in which that person is disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle or while that person’s license is suspended, revoked, cancelled, or otherwise withdrawn in any state or province of Canada; nor shall a commercial driver’s license be issued to a person who has a license issued by any other state unless the person first surrenders the commercial driver’s license issued by the other state, which license shall be returned to the issuing state for cancellation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 49, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 75, § 1.

31-10.3-31.
Violations — Penalties.

It shall be illegal for any person driving any commercial motor vehicle as defined in this chapter to operate or control that vehicle while under the influence of alcohol, drugs, toluene, or any other substance as defined in chapter 28 of title 21. For the purpose of this chapter, any person who drives, operates, or exercises physical control of a commercial motor vehicle while having a blood alcohol concentration of four-one-hundredths of one percent (.04%) or greater by weight, as shown by a chemical analysis of a blood, breath, or urine sample shall be guilty of the offense of driving while under the influence of liquor or drugs.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, it shall be illegal for any person to drive, operate, or be in physical control of a commercial motor vehicle while having alcohol in his or her system.

The administrator shall suspend, for at least one year, a commercial motor vehicle operator’s license or privilege who is found to have committed a first violation of:

Driving a commercial motor vehicle under the influence of alcohol or controlled substances;

Driving a commercial motor vehicle while the alcohol concentration in the person’s blood, breath, or other bodily substance is four-one-hundredths of one percent (.04%) or greater;

Leaving the scene of an accident involving a commercial motor vehicle driven by the person;

Using a commercial motor vehicle in the commission of a felony;

Refusing to submit to a chemical analysis of breath, blood, or urine while operating a commercial vehicle.

If the operator commits any of these violations while carrying hazardous materials requiring placards under federal/state regulations, the revocation shall be for a period of not less than three (3) years.

The administrator shall revoke for life, which may be reduced to a period of at least ten (10) years in accordance with department of revenue regulations, a commercial motor vehicle operator’s license or privilege who is found to have committed a second violation of:

Driving a commercial motor vehicle under the influence of alcohol or controlled substances;

Driving a commercial motor vehicle while the alcohol concentration in the person’s blood, breath, or other bodily substance is four-one-hundredths of one percent (.04%) or greater;

Knowingly and willfully leaving the scene of an accident involving a commercial motor vehicle driven by the person;

Using a commercial motor vehicle in the commission of a felony;

Refusing to submit to a chemical analysis of breath, blood, and/or urine while in a commercial motor vehicle.

The administrator shall revoke for life the commercial motor vehicle operator’s license or privilege of any person who is found to have used a commercial motor vehicle in the manufacture, distribution, or dispensing of a controlled substance or the possession with intent to distribute, manufacture, or dispense a controlled substance.

The administrator shall suspend the commercial motor vehicle operator’s license or privilege for a period of not less than sixty (60) days of each person who, in a three (3) year period, has committed two (2) serious traffic violations involving a commercial motor vehicle, and for not less than one hundred twenty (120) days of each person who has committed three (3) or more serious traffic violations in a three (3) year period.

Any person violating subsection (a) of this section shall, upon conviction, be subject to the fines, penalties, and assessments enumerated in §

31-27-2

for driving under the influence of liquor or drugs; except for the provision of license or privilege suspension of which the license shall be withdrawn in accordance with this chapter.

Any person violating §

31-10.3-26

, relating to the license to be carried and exhibited on demand, shall, upon conviction, be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00). For a second or subsequent conviction there shall be imposed a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100), and his or her commercial license or privilege shall be withdrawn for a period of one month.

Any person violating §

31-27-1

, relating to driving so as to endanger resulting in death, or §

31-27-1

.1, relating to driving so as to endanger, resulting in personal injury, shall, upon conviction, have his or her commercial license or privilege revoked for a period of one year. With respect to violations of §§ 31-27-1 and

31-27-1.1

, the commercial penalties shall only apply while the operator is operating a commercial vehicle; should the operator be operating a passenger vehicle, passenger penalties shall apply under §§ 31-27-1 and

31-27-1.1

.

Any person violating §

31-10.3-27

, relating to the limitation on the number of driver licenses, shall, upon conviction, be fined not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than twenty-five hundred dollars ($2,500), and any commercial license shall be cancelled immediately.

Any person violating §

31-10.3-28

, relating to notification required by the employee, shall, upon conviction, be fined not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

Any person violating §

31-10.3-29

, relating to employer responsibilities, shall, upon conviction be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

Any person violating subdivision (b)(1) of this section, relating to violations and penalties, shall immediately cease operating any commercial vehicle for a period of twenty-four (24) hours. Failure to do so shall result in a commercial license or privilege revocation for a period of three (3) months and a fine of one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

Any person violating §

31-10.3-30

, relating to the requirement of a commercial driver’s license, shall, upon conviction of a first offense, be fined not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000); and, upon conviction of a second or subsequent offense, be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). The person’s commercial license or privilege shall be revoked for a period of at least one year but not more than five (5) years.

The administrator may, after notice and hearing suspend a school bus driver’s certificate or privilege to obtain a certificate for a period of up to five (5) years from the date of adjudication or conviction of the following:

Any motor vehicle driving offense committed by a school bus driver while operating a self-propelled vehicle and which is a criminal offense in the state of Rhode Island or which, if committed outside the state, would be considered a criminal offense if committed in the state of Rhode Island;

Any alcohol or drug-related motor vehicle driving offense referred to in this section and committed by a school bus operator who is operating a self-propelled vehicle.

“Out-of-Service Order” means a declaration by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration or an authorized enforcement officer of a federal, state, Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, Canadian, Mexican or local jurisdiction that a driver of a commercial motor vehicle, a commercial motor vehicle or a motor carrier operation is out-of-service, pursuant to the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Regulations contained in 49 CFR Parts 383, 386, 387 and 390 — 399, as amended, or pursuant to comparable laws, or the North American Uniform Out-of-Service criteria.

The term “disqualified” means the withdrawal of a person’s privilege to drive a commercial motor vehicle.

Any person who violates an out-of-service order shall be disqualified as follows except as provided in subdivision (4) of this subsection:

A person shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of ninety (90) days if convicted of a first violation of an out-of-service order.

A person shall be disqualified for a period of one year if convicted of a second violation of an out-of-service order during any ten (10) year period arising from separate incidents.

A person shall be disqualified for a period of three (3) years if convicted of a third or subsequent violation of an out-of-service order during any ten (10) year period arising from separate incidents.

Any person who violates an out-of-service order while transporting hazardous materials or while operating a commercial motor vehicle designed or used to transport sixteen (16) or more passengers including the driver shall be disqualified as follows:

A person shall be disqualified for a period of one hundred eighty (180) days if convicted of a first violation of an out-of-service order.

A person shall be disqualified for a period of three (3) years if convicted of a second or subsequent violation of an out-of-service order during any ten (10) year period arising from separate incidents.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any driver who violates or fails to comply with an out-of-service order is subject to a penalty of one thousand one hundred dollars ($1,100) in addition to disqualification under this subsection.

Any employer who violates an out-of-service order, or who knowingly requires or permits a driver to violate or fail to comply with an out-of-service order, is subject to a penalty of two thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($2,750).

Disqualification for railroad-highway grade crossing violation.

General rule. A driver who is convicted of operating a commercial motor vehicle in violation of a federal, state, or local law or regulation pertaining to one of the following six (6) offenses at a railroad-highway grade crossing must be disqualified for the period of time specified in subsection (l)(2) of this section:

For drivers who are not required to always stop, failing to slow down and check that the tracks are clear of an approaching train;

For drivers who are not required to always stop, failing to stop before reaching the crossing, if the tracks are not clear;

For drivers who are always required to stop, failing to stop before driving onto the crossing;

For all drivers, failing to have sufficient space to drive completely through the crossing without stopping;

For all drivers, failing to obey a traffic control device or the directions of an enforcement official at the crossing;

For all drivers, failing to negotiate a crossing because of insufficient undercarriage clearance.

Duration of disqualification for railroad-highway grade crossing violation.

First violation. A driver must be disqualified for not less than sixty (60) days if the driver is convicted of a first violation of a railroad-highway grade crossing violation.

Second violation. A driver must be disqualified for not less than one hundred twenty (120) days if, during any three (3) year period, the driver is convicted of a second railroad-highway grade crossing violation in separate incidents.

Third or subsequent violation. A driver must be disqualified for not less than one year if, during any three (3) year period, the driver is convicted of a third or subsequent railroad-highway grade crossing violation in separate incidents.

Special penalties pertaining to railroad-highway grade crossing violations. An employer who is convicted of a violation of §

31-10.3-29(5)

is subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

Any person shall be subject to disqualification for a conviction of operating a commercial motor vehicle when the operator’s license is suspended, revoked, or cancelled or the operator is otherwise disqualified based on prior motor vehicle convictions.

Any person shall be subject to disqualification in accordance with 49 CFR 383.51(b), (c), (d) and (e).

The administrator shall disqualify, for up to one year, the commercial motor vehicle operator’s license or driving privilege of an operator whose driving constitutes an imminent hazard.

For the purposes of this section, “imminent hazard” means the existence of a condition that presents a substantial likelihood that death, serious illness, severe personal injury, or a substantial endangerment to health, property, or the environment may occur before the reasonably foreseeable completion date of a formal proceeding begun to lessen the risk of that death, illness, injury or endangerment.

After issuing a disqualification for a period of thirty (30) days or less, the administrator may provide the driver an opportunity for a hearing, and must provide the driver notice of a proposed disqualification period of more than thirty (30) days and an opportunity for a hearing to present a defense to the proposed disqualification.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 43, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 77, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 82, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 11; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 11; P.L. 2009, ch. 297, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 298, § 1.